North Carolina, session 2025, HB424.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 1 of Article 37 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 14-309.4. Certain social games not unlawful under certain circumstances.
Notwithstanding any provision of this Article to the contrary, it is not unlawful for persons
to gather for the purpose of engaging in board games or games of tiles, cards, or dice, including
canasta, mahjong, and bridge, where any money, property, or other thing of value is bet, if the
games are played in a private residence, home, or community clubhouse, and all of the following
requirements are met:
(1) No mechanical or electronic devices or machines of any kind, slot machines,
pull tabs, punch boards, pull boards, or video games, devices, or machines of
any kind are used for, or incorporated in, the games in any way.
(2) No person receives any direct or indirect economic, financial, or monetary
benefit other than personal winnings.
(3) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this section, the host of the game or
owner or lessee of the location in which the games are played does not receive
any direct or indirect economic, financial, or monetary benefit of any kind.
(4) Except for the advantage of skill or luck, the risks of losing or winning are the
same for all parties.
(5) The games are played no more than one day in any seven-day period at any
private residence, home, or community clubhouse."
SECTION 2. G.S. 14-309.28 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-309.28. Limits on game night events.
The following limitations apply to game night events:
(1) The number of game night events conducted or sponsored by an exempt
organization shall be limited to four events per year.
(2) The event shall not exceed a period of five hours each per event. No more than
one game night event shall be held in any quarter of a calendar year that begins
January 1.
*H424-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) No more than two game night events shall be operated or conducted in any
one building, hall, or structure during any one calendar week, and if two events
are held, they must be held by different exempt organizations on different
nights of the week.
(4) There shall be no operation of a game night event between the hours of 2:00
A.M. and 12:00 noon Monday through Saturday or between the hours of 2:00
A.M. and 2:00 P.M. Sunday.
(5) A facility authorized to host a game night under this Part shall not host more
than two 24 game nights in any calendar month.calendar year."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 424-Third Edition